Texas statutes.
CIVIL PRACTICE AND REMEDIES CODE

TITLE 6. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 134. TEXAS THEFT LIABILITY ACT

Sec. 134.001. SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be cited as the Texas Theft Liability Act.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 4.05(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 134.002. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other group, however organized.

(2) "Theft" means unlawfully appropriating property or unlawfully obtaining services as described by Section 31.03, 31.04, 31.06, 31.07, 31.11, 31.12, 31.13, or 31.14, Penal Code.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 4.05(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 858, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 10 (S.B. 953), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 134.003. LIABILITY. (a) A person who commits theft is liable for the damages resulting from the theft.

(b) A parent or other person who has the duty of control and reasonable discipline of a child is liable for theft committed by the child.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 4.05(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 134.004. SUIT. A suit under this chapter may be brought in the county where the theft occurred or in the county where the defendant resides.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 4.05(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 134.005. RECOVERY. (a) In a suit under this chapter, a person who has sustained damages resulting from theft may recover:

(1) under Section 134.003(a), from a person who commits theft, the amount of actual damages found by the trier of fact and, in addition to actual damages, damages awarded by the trier of fact in a sum not to exceed $1,000; or

(2) from a parent or other person who has the duty of control and reasonable discipline of a child, for an action brought under Section 134.003(b), the amount of actual damages found by the trier of fact, not to exceed $5,000.

(b) Each person who prevails in a suit under this chapter shall be awarded court costs and reasonable and necessary attorney's fees.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 4.05(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.